Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 14, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20N), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20N. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or
after January 1, 2026, Class D1 shall include the following criminal
offenses:

1. Public warehouse and/or or commodity stock fraud, as
provided for in Section 9-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. False issuance of warehouse receipt, as provided for in
Section 9-35 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Misrepresentation of charter, as provided for in Section 9-
36 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Tampering with anhydrous equipment, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 11-10 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Willfully burn forest, grass, crops, or woodlands, as
provided for in Section 16-25 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. Willful and unlawful burning of forest, grass, croplands,
rangeland, or other wild lands by owner, as provided for in Section
16-28.1 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Possession of incendiary device with the intent to burn, as
provided for in Section 16-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
8. Operate aircraft not registered with the Federal Aviation
Administration Office of Aircraft Registry or foreign country, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 258 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
9. Supply false information in regard to aircraft ownership, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 258 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
10. Concealing identity of aircraft, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 258 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 259 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
12. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft
with intent to conceal, as provided for in subsection B of Section
259 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 2

13. Sell, purchase, or possess aircraft with removed or
falsified identification number with intent to misrepresent the
identity of aircraft, as provided for in subsection D of Section 259
of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
14. Operating aircraft under the influence of alcohol, second
or subsequent offense within ten (10) years, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
15. Operating aircraft under the influence of intoxicant,
second or subsequent offense with ten (10) years, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
16. Unauthorized use of aircraft, as provided for in subsection
A of Section 321 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Charge fee for horse race without a license, as provided
for in Section 205 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
18. Pari-mutuel wagering without a license, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 208.4 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
19. Entering racehorse under false name, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. Entering racehorse without name being registered, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Using racing stimulating devices, as provided for in
Section 208.7 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
22. Racetrack bribery or ticket falsification, as provided for
in Section 208.8 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
23. Unauthorized wagering on horse racing, as provided for in
Section 208.9 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
24. Falsification of information on racehorse, as provided for
in Section 208.10 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 3

25. Administer a drug or medication without authorization to
horse prior to racing, as provided for in subsection C of Section
208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
26. Violation of horse racing drug provisions, as provided for
in subsection D of Section 208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
27. Forging and/or or counterfeiting state lottery ticket, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 727 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
28. Influence lottery win by fraud, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 727 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
29. Own dog that attacks and kills a person, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
30. Release dog on law enforcement officer, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
31. Pledging assets of bank as collateral, as provided in
Section 809 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
32. Unlawful compensation of bank officer, as provided for in
Section 1405 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
33. Receipt of deposits while insolvent, as provided for in
Section 1406 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. Unlawful service as bank officer or director, as provided
for in Section 1407 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
35. Serving as bank commissioner, administrative assistant, or
assistant banking commissioner with a felony conviction, as provided
for in Section 1408 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
36. Concealing bank transaction, as provided for in Section
1409 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 4

37. Improper maintenance of accounts or false or deceptive
entries and statements, as provided for in Section 1410 of Title 6
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
38. Payment of penalties and judgments against others, as
provided for in Section 1411 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
39. Embezzlement of bank funds, as provided for in Section 1412
of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
40. Circulation of statement or representation for the purpose
of injuring any bank institution, as provided for in Section 1413 of
Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
41. Authorizing, executing, or ratifying a criminal offense, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
42. Violation of any lawful order of the Board or Commissioner,
as provided for in subsection C of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
43. Bank advertising with confusingly similar name, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
44. Using shortened confusingly similar name for advertising,
as provided for in subsection B of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
45. Acquiring another bank but using former name, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
46. Non-banking business using confusingly similar name, as
provided for in subsection D of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
47. Registered sex offender providing services in a child care
facility, as provided for in subsection F of Section 404.1 of Title
10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 5

48. Failure to report child abuse, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1-2-101 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
49. Interception of wire, oral, or electronic communication, as
provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
50. Using devices to intercept oral communication, as provided
for in paragraph 2 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
51. Disclosing contents of wire, oral, or electronic
communication, as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 176.3 of
Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
52. Using contents of wire, oral, or electronic communication,
as provided for in paragraph 4 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
53. Removing, injuring, or obstructing telephone line, as
provided for in paragraph 5 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
54. Carrying devices for interception of wire, oral, or
electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section
176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
55. Making devices for interception of wire, oral, or
electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 7 of Section
176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
56. Using communication facility in committing felonies, as
provided for in paragraph 8 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
57. Violation of the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act, as
provided for in Section 753 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
58. Violation of the Home Repair Fraud Act, as provided for in
Section 765.3 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 6

59. Conduct closing-out sale without license, as provided for
in Section 767 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
60. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act, as provided
for in Section 776.1 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
61. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act for
commercial electronic mail, as provided for in Section 776.6 of
Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
62. Conceal or destroy corporation records, as provided for in
Section 16 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
63. Misapplication of funds, as provided for in Section 411 of
Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
64. Solicit funds to secure old age assistance by deception or
fraud, as provided for in Section 553.1 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
65. Inspector, judge, or clerk refusing to extend or enforce
the right to sign and deliver the certificate of election votes, as
provided for in Section 90 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
66. Knowing and willful failure or refusal to perform duties,
as provided for in Section 91 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
67. County officer failing to make daily deposit, as provided
for in Section 682 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
68. Use of false or illegal voucher by county official, as
provided for in Section 686 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
69. Holding oneself out as law enforcement personnel as
provided in subsections A and B of Section 264 of this title;
70. Gift to influence legislator, as provided for in Section
318 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
70. 71. Legislator receiving payoff for employment of other, as
provided for in Section 321 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 7

71. 72. Lobbying legislature on contingency fee basis, as
provided for in Section 334 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
72. 73. Furnishing public supplies for profit, as provided for
in subsection A of Section 355 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
73. 74. Purchase public supplies from business that employs
family member or spouse with more than five percent (5%) interest,
as provided for in subsection C of Section 355 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
74. 75. Make false claim against the state, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 358 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
75. 76. Bribing an officer, as provided for in Section 381 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
76. 77. Bribing participant or official in athletic contest, as
provided for in Section 399 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
77. 78. Engaging in pattern of criminal offenses, as provided
for in Section 425 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
78. 79. Escape from county or city jail, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
79. 80. Escape from the Department of Corrections or
alternative incarceration, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
80. 81. Escape from juvenile detention facility, as provided
for in subsection E of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 8

81. 82. Unauthorized entry into penal institution or jail, as
provided for in Section 445 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
82. 83. Preparing false evidence, as provided for in Section
453 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
83. 84. Bribing witness to falsely testify, as provided for in
Section 456 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
84. 85. Larceny or destruction of records by clerk or officer,
as provided for in Section 461 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
85. 86. Larceny or destruction of records by person other than
officers, as provided for in Section 462 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
86. 87. Offer forged or false instruments for the record, as
provided for in Section 463 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
87. 88. Perjury, as provided for in Section 491 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
88. 89. Contradictory statements as perjury, as provided for in
Section 496 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
89. 90. Perjury by subornation, as provided for in Section 504
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
90. 91. Falsify public record, as provided for in Section 531
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
91. 92. Fortifying access point to place where felony is being
committed, as provided for in Section 540C of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
92. 93. Compounding a crime, as provided for in Section 543 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 9

93. 94. Substitute a child to deceive a parent or guardian, as
provided for in Section 579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
94. 95. Record, listen to, or observe jury proceedings, as
provided for in Section 588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
95. 96. Abuse, sexual abuse, or exploitation of a vulnerable
adult, as provided for in subsection A of Section 843.3 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
96. 97. Neglect of a vulnerable adult, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
97. 98. Procuring an abortion, as provided for in Section 861
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
98. 99. Adultery, as provided for in Section 871 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
99. 100. Bigamy, as provided for in Section 881 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
100. 101. Knowingly marrying a bigamist, as provided for in
Section 884 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
101. 102. Confidence game by cards, as provided for in Section
954 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
102. 103. Dealing in gambling devices, as provided for in
Section 984 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
103. 104. Install communication of gambling information, as
provided for in Section 986 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
104. 105. Dissemination of gambling information, as provided
for in Section 987 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 10

105. 106. Conspiracy to violate gambling laws, as provided for
in Section 988 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
106. 107. Engaging in prostitution while HIV-infected, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
107. 108. Engage in or operate prostitution within one thousand
(1,000) feet of a school or church, as provided for in subsection D
of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
108. 109. Interactive computer service provider failing to
remove child pornography, third or subsequent offense, as provided
for in Section 1040.80 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title;
109. 110. Gain or attempt to gain value from nonconsensual
dissemination of private sexual images, as provided for in
subsection G of Section 1040.13b of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
110. 111. Sex offender entering safety zone around school, as
provided for in Section 1125 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
111. 112. Unlawful removal of dead body, as provided for in
Section 1161 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
112. 113. Purchasing or receiving dead body, as provided for in
Section 1162 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
113. 114. Using photographic, electronic, or video equipment in
clandestine manner, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1171
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
114. 115. Obscene, threatening, or harassing phone call, second
or subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1172 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
115. 116. Spreading infectious diseases, as provided for in
Section 1192 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 11

116. 117. Altering livestock appearance for exhibition, second
or subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1229 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
117. 118. Unlawfully transport hazardous waste, as provided for
in Section 1230.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
118. 119. Unlawful waste management, as provided for in Section
1230.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
119. 120. False statements and acts concerning permits and
waste, as provided for in Section 1230.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
120. 121. Unlawful disposal of hazardous waste, as provided for
in Section 1230.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
121. 122. Attempts to violate the Sabotage Prevention Act, as
provided for in Section 1265.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
122. 123. Carry weapon with intent to injure another, as
provided for in Section 1278 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
123. 124. Teaching, demonstrating, or training use of firearms
in furtherance of riot, as provided for in Section 1320.10 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
124. 125. Delivering fraudulent bill of lading, as provided for
in Section 1411 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
125. 126. Maintaining fraudulent warehouse receipts, as
provided for in Section 1412 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
126. 127. Issuing duplicate bills of lading or warehouse
receipts, as provided for in Section 1414 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 12

127. 128. Selling goods without consent of holder of bill of
lading, as provided for in Section 1415 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
128. 129. Unlawful delivery of goods, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1416 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
129. 130. Burglary in the third degree, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 1435 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
130. 131. Embezzlement of property, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1451 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
131. 132. Extortion, as provided for in Section 1481 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
132. 133. Extortion induced by threats, as provided for in
Section 1482 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
133. 134. Obtain signatures by extortion, as provided for in
Section 1485 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
134. 135. Extortion by threatening letter, as provided for in
Section 1486 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
135. 136. Blackmail, as provided for in Section 1488 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
136. 137. Defrauding hotel, inn, or restaurant, value of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1503 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
137. 138. Renting motor vehicle with bogus check, value of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1521 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 13

138. 139. Receive money or property by impersonating another,
value from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of
Section 1532 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
139. 140. False use of “State Police” with intent to
communicate policing authority, and another is injured, defrauded,
harassed, or vexed, as provided for in subsection G of Section 1533
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
140. 141. Identity theft, as provided for in Section 1533.1 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
141. 142. Felony value – false pretense, bogus check, con game,
valued from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1541.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
142. 143. Two or more false or bogus checks, valued from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1541.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
143. 144. Obtaining money or property with false negotiable
paper, as provided for in Section 1544 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
144. 145. Signs credit or debit card with intent to defraud, as
provided for in subsection (a) A of Section 1550.28 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
145. 146. Possess credit or debit card of another with intent
to defraud, as provided for in subsection (b) B of Section 1550.28
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
146. 147. Possessing incomplete credit cards with intent to
complete, as provided for in Section 1550.31 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
147. 148. Possess firearm with altered ID during commission of
a felony, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1550 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 14

148. 149. Make, sell, or display false identification for
felony purposes or to mislead police officer, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1550.41 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
149. 150. Forgery of state, public, court, or corporate seals,
as provided for in Section 1571 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
150. 151. Forgery of records, as provided for in Section 1572
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
151. 152. Making false entry in records, as provided for in
Section 1573 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
152. 153. Forgery of certification or acknowledgement of
conveyance, as provided for in Section 1574 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
153. 154. Forgery II / Forgery III, valued from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1577 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
154. 155. Possession of forged evidence of debt, valued from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1578 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
155. 156. Possession of other forged instrument, valued from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
156. 157. Issuing spurious or false certificates of stock, as
provided for in Section 1580 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
157. 158. Reissuing canceled certificates of stock, as provided
for in Section 1581 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 15

158. 159. Issuing or pledging false evidence of debt, as
provided for in Section 1582 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
159. 160. Counterfeiting coin, as provided for in Section 1583
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
160. 161. Counterfeiting coin for exportation, as provided for
in Section 1584 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
161. 162. Forging process of court or title to property, as
provided for in Section 1585 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
162. 163. Making false entries in public book, as provided for
in Section 1586 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
163. 164. Forging tickets of passage, as provided for in
Section 1587 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
164. 165. Forging postage stamps, as provided for in Section
1588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
165. 166. Falsification of corporate records, as provided for
in Section 1589 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
166. 167. Employee making false entries, as provided for in
Section 1590 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
167. 168. Possessing counterfeit coin with intent to circulate,
as provided for in Section 1591 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
168. 169. Uttering forged instruments, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1592 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
169. 170. Falsely procuring another’s signature, as provided
for in Section 1593 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 16

170. 171. Utter signature of another with same name, as
provided for in Section 1622 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
171. 172. Uttering one’s endorsement as another’s, as provided
for in Section 1623 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
172. 173. Erasure or alterations with intent to defraud, as
provided for in Section 1624 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
173. 174. Sign fictitious name as officer of corporation, as
provided for in Section 1626 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
174. 175. Fraudulent insolvency of corporation, as provided for
in Section 1639 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
175. 176. Workers’ compensation fraud, as provided for in
Section 1663 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
176. 177. Willfully poisoning animal, as provided for in
Section 1681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
177. 178. Larceny of lost property, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1702 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
178. 179. Grand larceny, value from Two Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1705 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
179. 180. Larceny of written instrument, as provided for in
Section 1709 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
180. 181. Receive, possess, or conceal stolen property, value
from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1713 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 17

181. 182. Bringing stolen property into state, value from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1715 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
182. 183. Larceny of dogs, as provided for in Section 1718 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
183. 184. Larceny of or receiving stolen fowls, as provided for
in Section 1719 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
184. 185. Larceny of domesticated fish or game, value One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1719.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
185. 186. Larceny of auto, aircraft, or other motor vehicle,
value less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), as provided for
in Section 1720 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
186. 187. Larceny from building or house, as provided for in
Section 1723 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
187. 188. Possession of mercury, as provided for in Section
1726 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
188. 189. Entering with intent to steal copper, as provided for
in Section 1727 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
189. 190. Possessing, receiving, or transporting stolen copper,
as provided for in Section 1728 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
190. 191. Larceny of merchandise from retailer, value from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1731 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
191. 192. Larceny of trade secrets, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1732 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 18

192. 193. Procuring, selling, or receiving telephone records by
fraud (single telephone record), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1742.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
193. 194. Injury to or obstruction of railroad, as provided for
in Section 1751 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
194. 195. Interfering with railroad, as provided for in Section
1752.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
195. 196. Possess, use, manufacture, or threaten to use
incendiary device or explosives without injury, as provided for in
Section 1767.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
196. 197. Removing or injuring piles securing bank or dam, as
provided for in Section 1777 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
197. 198. Maliciously injuring written instrument, value from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1779 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
198. 199. Place hard object or inflammable object in grain or
cotton, as provided for in Section 1837 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
199. 200. Selling five or more unlawful telecommunication
devices within six (6) months, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 1873 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
200. 201. Manufacturing five or more unlawful
telecommunications devices within six (6) months, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 1874 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
201. 202. Unauthorized removal of baggage or cargo from bus or
terminal, as provided for in Section 1904 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 19

202. 203. Access computer system or network with unlawful
intent, as provided for in Section 1958 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
203. 204. Reproduction of sound recording without consent, one
hundred (100) or more articles, as provided for in Section 1976 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
204. 205. Unlawfully sell sound recordings, as provided for in
Section 1977 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
205. 206. Broadcast or live recording for sale without consent,
as provided for in Section 1978 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
206. 207. Rent or sell articles without true name of
manufacturer, as provided for in Section 1979 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
207. 208. Counterfeiting recording or article label, as
provided for in Section 1980 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
208. 209. Violation of Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act, as
provided for in Section 1990.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
209. 210. Tampering with security equipment, as provided for in
Section 1993 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
210. 211. Sex offender engaging in ice cream truck vending, as
provided for in Section 2100.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
211. 212. Protective order violation, second or subsequent
offense, as provided for in subsection A of Section 60.6 of Title 22
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
212. 213. Protective order violation resulting in physical
injury, as provided for in subsection B of Section 60.6 of Title 22
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 20

213. 214. Disposal of seized liquor by officer, as provided for
in Section 1263 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
214. 215. False affidavits, as provided for in Section 1264 of
Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
215. 216. Interfering with voting machine, as provided for in
Section 9-118 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
216. 217. Voting illegally, as provided for in Section 16-102
of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
217. 218. Removing ballot from or carrying ballot into polling
place, as provided for in Section 16-102.1 of Title 26 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
218. 219. False application for an absentee ballot, as provided
for in Section 16-102.2 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
219. 220. False affidavit in voting registration, as provided
for in Section 16-103 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
220. 221. Causing unqualified persons to be invalidly
registered, as provided for in Section 16-103.1 of Title 26 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
221. 222. False notarization of absentee ballot, as provided
for in Section 16-104 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
222. 223. Perpetrate fraud or theft to affect election, as
provided for in Section 16-105 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
223. 224. Bribes to influence votes, as provided for in Section
16-106 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
224. 225. Offer bribe to withdraw as candidate, as provided for
in Section 16-107 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
225. 226. Solicit or accept bribe for withdrawal of candidacy,
as provided for in Section 16-108 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 21

226. 227. Prevent person from registering to vote or voting, as
provided for in Section 16-109 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
227. 228. Printing or possession of ballots illegally, as
provided for in Section 16-120 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
228. 229. Violation of the Oklahoma Pollutant Discharge
Elimination System Act, as provided for in subsection G of Section
2-6-206 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
229. 230. Falsely state information to the Department of
Environmental Quality, as provided for in Section 2-7-109 of Title
27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
230. 231. Falsify information on permit application for
Oklahoma Solid Waste Management Act, as provided for in Section 2-
10-302 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
231. 232. Violation of use of solid waste disposal sites, as
provided for in Section 2-10-801 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
232. 233. Filing false sale with Insurance Commissioner, as
provided for in Section 311.1 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
233. 234. Selling insurance with revoked or suspended license,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
234. 235. Aiding or conspiring with a person whose insurance
license is revoked or suspended, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
235. 236. False statements, reports, or filings with intent to
deceive Insurance Commissioner, as provided for in subsection E of
Section 1643 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
236. 237. Violation of the Viatical Settlements Act of 2008,
value from Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to Two Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), as provided for in subsection F of
Section 4055.14 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 22

237. 238. Violation of prepaid funeral provisions, as provided
for in Section 6130 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
238. 239. Out-of-state retailer shipping alcoholic beverages
into state, as provided for in Section 3-101 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
239. 240. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or
consume alcohol, as provided for in subsection A of Section 6-101 of
Title 37A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
240. 241. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or
consume alcohol resulting in great bodily injury or death, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 6-101 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
241. 242. Sale of alcoholic beverages outside of authorized day
or hours, as provided for in Section 6-123 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
242. 243. Disclosing confidential information concerning
violation of Employment Security Act of 1980, as provided for in
Section 4-508 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
243. 244. Hiring armed guards without permit, as provided for
in Section 169 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
244. 245. Causing employee death by commanding to enter steam
boiler, as provided for in Section 183 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
245. 246. False statement about lien by contractor, as provided
for in Section 142.4 of Title 42 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
246. 247. Mechanics liens/embezzlement, valued from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 142.6 of Title 42
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
247. 248. Marrying prohibited persons, as provided for in
Section 14 of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 23

248. 249. Bigamy and remarriage, as provided for in Section 123
of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
249. 250. Mistreatment of mental health patient, as provided
for in Section 2-219 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
250. 251. Violation of opioid substitution treatment program,
as provided for in Section 3-601 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
251. 252. Coerce another to execute a declaration of revocation
of an advanced directive, as provided for in subsection D of Section
11-113 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
252. 253. Unauthorized use of implement of husbandry, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-102 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
253. 254. Receive, possess, or conceal implement of husbandry,
as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-103 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
254. 255. Removed, falsified, or unauthorized identification,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
255. 256. Buy, receive, possess, or sell motor vehicle with VIN
removed or defaced with intent to conceal, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
256. 257. Destroying, removing, altering, covering, or
counterfeiting trim tag plates, as provided for in Section 4-107a of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
257. 258. Misuse of manufactured home certificate of title, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
258. 259. Alter manufactured home certificate of title, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 24

259. 260. Remove receipt with intent to misrepresent payment of
tax or fees, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
260. 261. Purchase registration receipt on assigned certificate
of title, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
261. 262. Misuse of forged, counterfeit, or suspended driver
license, as provided for in Section 6-301 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
262. 263. Perjury through false affidavit, as provided for in
Section 6-302 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
263. 264. Interference with traffic control device resulting in
injury or death, as provided for in subsection B of Section 11-207
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
264. 265. Buy, sell, or dispose vehicle with altered VIN, chop
shop, as provided for in subsection C of Section 1503 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
265. 266. Attempt to violate chop shop laws, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 1503 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
266. 267. Perjury before the Corporation Commission, as
provided for in Section 108 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
267. 268. Delay probation duties of the Corporation Commission
with use or attempted use of firearms, as provided for in Section
114 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
268. 269. Conspiracy to violate Oklahoma Oil and Gas
Conservation Act, as provided for in Section 115 of Title 52 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
269. 270. Corruption of Corporation Commission, as provided for
in Section 117 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
270. 271. Misappropriation of gas, as provided for in Section
235 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 25

271. 272. Falsification of application for emergency relief, as
provided for in Section 26.18 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
272. 273. Medicaid fraud, as provided for in Section 1005 of
Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
273. 274. Fraudulently obtaining or receiving assistance, value
of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, as provided for in
Section 1005.1 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
274. 275. Carry contraband into jail or prison, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
275. 276. Possess cell phone in jail or prison, as provided for
in subsection E of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
276. 277. Jail employee receiving compensation from inmate,
value of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more, as provided for in
Section 22 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
277. 278. Use of convict labor on private property, as provided
for in Section 222 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
278. 279. Failure to comply with Mary Rippy Violent Crime
Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in Section 599 of Title
57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
279. 280. Practicing dentistry without a license, as provided
for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
280. 281. Giving false information to obtain license, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
281. 282. Impersonating a pharmacist, as provided for in
Section 353.17A of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
282. 283. Alteration of prescription or unlawful dispensing of
drugs, second violation, as provided for in Section 353.24 of Title
59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 26

283. 284. False representation in procuring license under the
Oklahoma Pharmacy Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section
353.25 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
284. 285. Cremation without license and permit, as provided for
in Section 396.33 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
285. 286. Practicing medicine without a license, as provided
for in Section 491 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
286. 287. Violation of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act,
as provided for in Section 638 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
287. 288. Acting as building inspector without a license, as
provided for in Section 1044 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
288. 289. Affidavit as to undertaking, as provided for in
Section 1322 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
289. 290. Bail jumping, as provided for in Section 1335 of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
290. 291. False declaration of ownership in pawn shop, value of
One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, if property is firearms,
or was acquired through robbery or burglary, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1512 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
291. 292. Violation of Oklahoma Security Guard and Private
Investigator Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1750.11
of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
292. 293. Collusion among bidders, as provided for in Section
115 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
293. 294. Disclosure of terms of bids, as provided for in
Section 116 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
294. 295. False or illegal voucher by public official, as
provided for in Section 81 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 27

295. 296. Use of facsimile signature or seal with intent to
defraud, as provided for in Section 604 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
296. 297. Distribution of controlled substance, possession with
intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided for in subsection
A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
297. 298. Distribution of counterfeit controlled substance,
possession with intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
298. 299. Robbery of controlled dangerous substance, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 2-403 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
299. 300. Distribute or dispense controlled substance without
required order form, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-
404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
300. 301. Manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled
substance not authorized by registration, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
301. 302. Omit, remove, alter, or obliterate symbol required on
controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-
404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
302. 303. Refuse or fail to make, keep, or furnish required
information, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
303. 304. Refuse entry or inspection of premises with respect
to controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section
2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
304. 305. Maintain place for keeping or selling controlled
substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 28

305. 306. Sell, transfer, or provide money transmitter
equipment to unlicensed person, second or subsequent offense, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 2-503.1d of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
306. 307. Responsibility of permit holders, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 124.8 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
307. 308. Purchase or sell body parts for transplantation, as
provided for in Section 2200.16A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
308. 309. Falsification, forgery, concealment, defacement, or
obliteration of document of gift, as provided for in Section
2200.17A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
309. 310. Unlawful possession of vessel or motor, as provided
for in Section 4209 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
310. 311. Receive, possess, sell, or dispose of stolen vessel
or motor, as provided for in Section 4209.1 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
311. 312. Remove or alter ID number of vessel, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
312. 313. Buy, receive, possess, or dispose of vessel with
false ID number with intent to conceal, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
313. 314. False statement in application for certificate of
title for stolen vehicle, as provided for in Section 4209.3 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
314. 315. Alteration or forging of vessel certificate of title,
as provided for in Section 4209.4 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
315. 316. Possess vessel with altered ID number, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 29

316. 317. Destroying or falsifying checks to the Land Office,
as provided for in Section 1026 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
317. 318. Prospecting on public lands without permit, as
provided for in Section 1094 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
318. 319. Business for profit by a member of the Department of
Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 304 of
Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
319. 320. Business for profit by a member of the Department of
Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 324 of
Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
320. 321. Failure to comply with request for county records, as
provided for in Section 83 of Title 67 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
321. 322. Refusal to file tax return with intent to defraud, as
provided for in Section 240.1 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
322. 323. Filing false sales tax report, as provided for in
Section 241 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
323. 324. Possession of controlled dangerous substances without
tax stamp, as provided for in Section 450.8 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
324. 325. Remove tax stamp with intent to reuse, as provided
for in Section 450.9 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
325. 326. Making false oath to report required by Cotton
Manufacturers Act, as provided for in Section 2003 of Title 68 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
326. 327. File false income tax return with intent to defraud,
as provided for in Section 2376 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
327. 328. Fraudulent tax receipt by county treasurer, as
provided for in Section 2920 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 30

328. 329. False or fraudulent lists of taxable property, as
provided for in Section 2945 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
329. 330. False application under Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program
Act, as provided for in Section 3609 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
330. 331. False application under Former Military Facility
Development Act, as provided for in Section 3807 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
331. 332. False application under Oklahoma Specialized Quality
Investment Act, as provided for in Section 4109 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
332. 333. False application under Oklahoma Quality Investment
Act, as provided for in Section 4209 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
333. 334. Conflict of interest by a member of the
Transportation Commission, as provided for in Section 310 of Title
69 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
334. 335. Conflict of interest by a member of the Oklahoma
Turnpike Authority, as provided for in Section 1705 of Title 69 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
335. 336. Violation of Oklahoma Highway Code of 1968, as
provided for in Section 1802 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
336. 337. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Educational
Television Authority member, as provided for in Section 23-106 of
Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
337. 338. Alter or destroy audit records by Board of Regents,
as provided for in subsection E of Section 3909 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
338. 339. Authority to receive gifts or funds, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 4306 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 31

339. 340. Make takeover offer which is not effective under
Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of 1985, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 453 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
340. 341. Fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative acts in
takeover offer, as provided for in Section 455 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
341. 342. Violation of Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of
1985, as provided for in Section 460 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
342. 343. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Capitol Improvement
Authority member, as provided for in Section 162 of Title 73 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
343. 344. Fraud in obtaining certification as a minority
business, as provided for in Section 85.45h of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
344. 345. False statement for small business surety bond
guarantee, as provided for in Section 85.47h of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
345. 346. Forge or alter criminal history record, as provided
for in subsection D of Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
346. 347. Making or receiving kickback, as provided for in
Section 3404 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
347. 348. Pooling of bridge or highway contracts, as provided
for in Section 101 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
348. 349. Business for profit by Oklahoma Water Resources Board
member, as provided for in Section 1086.3 of Title 82 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
349. 350. Conflict of interest by water district official or
employee, as provided for in Section 1281 of Title 82 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 32

350. 351. Falsely executes a written declaration as a witness
to a will, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section 55 of Title 84
of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
351. 352. False statement and misrepresentation, as provided
for in Section 6 of Title 85A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class D1 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not more than
five (5) years and shall serve at least twenty percent (20%) of the
sentence imposed before release from custody including release to
electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
C. 1. Every person who, having been previously convicted of
one or two a Class C or Class D criminal offenses offense, commits a
Class D1 criminal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a
term of not less than one (1) year nor more than seven (7) years and
shall serve at least twenty percent (20%) of the sentence imposed
before release from custody including release to electronic
monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
2. Every person who, having been previously convicted of three
or more Class C or Class D criminal offenses, or one or more Class
Y, Class A, or Class B criminal offenses, commits a Class D1
criminal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not
less than two (2) years nor more than ten (10) years and shall serve
at least thirty percent (30%) of the sentence imposed before release
from custody including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to
Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. Unless specifically exempted pursuant to subsection E of
this section, Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title shall not apply to Class D1 criminal offenses.
E. The criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 98 99, 108 109,
212 213, 213 214, and 229 230 of subsection A of this section shall
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 33

be exempt from the penalty provisions provided for in subsections B
and C of this section. Persons convicted of the criminal offenses
provided for in paragraphs 98 99, 108 109, 212 213, 213 214, and 229
230 of subsection A of this section shall be punished in accordance
with the corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma
Statutes including Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title.
F. All Class D1 criminal offenses shall be punishable by the
corresponding fines as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 264, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 264. A. Any person who shall without due authority
exercise or attempt to exercise the functions of or hold himself or
herself out to any one as a federal law enforcement agent or
officer, deputy sheriff, state trooper, marshal, police officer,
constable or peace officer shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not
more than one (1) year, or by a fine not exceeding One Hundred
Dollars ($100.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment; provided,
however Class D1 felony punishable by imprisonment as provided in
subsections B through E of Section 20N of this title and by a fine
not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). However, this
section subsection shall not be so construed as to prevent private
persons from making arrests for felonies or misdemeanors committed
in their presence.
B. It shall be unlawful for any person to affix on his or her
motor vehicle, either temporarily or permanently, any insignia
typically used by a law enforcement agency for the purpose of
causing any other motor vehicle operator to yield the right-of-way
and stop, or which actually causes any other motor vehicle operator
to yield the right-of-way and stop, whether intended or not. Any
person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in
the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or Class D1 felony
punishable by imprisonment as provided in subsections B through E of
Section 20N of this title and by a fine not exceeding One Thousand
Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment more than
Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). The provisions of this
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 34

subsection shall not apply to vehicles of any fire department, fire
patrol, law enforcement vehicles, ambulances, or other authorized
emergency vehicles.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1738, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 133, O.S.L. 2023 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1738), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1738. A. 1. Any commissioned peace officer of this
state is authorized to seize any equipment, vehicle, airplane,
vessel or any other conveyance that is used in the commission of any
armed robbery offense defined in Section 801 of this title, used to
facilitate the intentional discharge of any kind of firearm in
violation of Section 652 of this title, used in violation of the
Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act, used in the attempt or commission
of any act of burglary in the first or second degree, motor vehicle
theft, unauthorized use of a vehicle, obliteration of distinguishing
numbers on vehicles or criminal possession of vehicles with altered,
removed or obliterated numbers as defined by Sections 1431, 1435,
1716, 1719 and 1720 of this title or Sections 4-104 and 4-107 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, used in the commission of any
arson offense defined in Section 1401, 1402, 1403, 1404 or 1405 of
this title, used in holding oneself out as law enforcement personnel
as provided for in Section 264 of this title, used in any manner to
facilitate or participate in the commission of any human trafficking
offense in violation of Section 748 of this title, or used by any
defendant when such vehicle or other conveyance is used in any
manner by a prostitute, pimp or panderer to facilitate or
participate in the commission of any prostitution offense in
violation of Sections 1028, 1029 or 1030 of this title; provided,
however, that the vehicle or conveyance of a customer or anyone
merely procuring the services of a prostitute shall not be included.
2. No conveyance used by a person as a common carrier in the
transaction of business as a common carrier shall be forfeited under
the provisions of this section unless it shall appear that the owner
or other person in charge of such conveyance was a consenting party
or privy to the unlawful use of the conveyance in violation of this
section.
3. No conveyance shall be forfeited under the provisions of
this section by reason of any act or omission established by the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 35

owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without the
knowledge or consent of such owner, and if the act is committed by
any person other than such owner, the owner shall establish further
that the conveyance was unlawfully in the possession of a person
other than the owner in violation of the criminal laws of the United
States or of any state.
B. In addition to the property described in subsection A of
this section, the following property is also subject to forfeiture
pursuant to this section:
1. Property used in the commission of theft of livestock or in
any manner to facilitate the theft of livestock;
2. The proceeds gained from the commission of theft of
livestock;
3. Personal property acquired with proceeds gained from the
commission of theft of livestock;
4. All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels,
and horses or dogs which are used to transport or in any manner to
facilitate the transportation for the purpose of the commission of
theft of livestock;
5. Any items having a counterfeit mark and all property that is
owned by or registered to the defendant that is employed or used in
connection with any violation of the Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting
Act;
6. Any weapon possessed, used or available for use in any
manner during the commission of a felony within the State of
Oklahoma, or any firearm that is possessed by a convicted felon;
7. Any police scanner used in violation of Section 1214 of this
title;
8. Any computer and its components and peripherals, including
but not limited to the central processing unit, monitor, keyboard,
printers, scanners, software, and hardware, when it is used in the
commission of any crime in this state;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 36

9. All property used in the commission of, or in any manner to
facilitate, a violation of Section 1040.12a of this title;
10. All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels,
monies, coins and currency, or other instrumentality used or
intended to be used, in any manner or part, to commit a violation of
paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 1021 of this title, where the
victim of the crime is a minor child, subsection B of Section 1021
of this title, Section 1021.2 of this title, paragraph 1 of
subsection A of Section 1111 of this title, or paragraphs 2 and 3 of
subsection A of Section 1123 of this title;
11. All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels,
monies, coins and currency, or other instrumentality used in any
manner or part, to commit any violation of the provisions set forth
in Section 748 of this title;
12. Any and all property used in any manner or part to
facilitate, participate or further the commission of a human
trafficking offense in violation of Section 748 of this title, and
all property, including monies, real estate, or any other tangible
assets or property of or derived from or used by a prostitute, pimp
or panderer in any manner or part to facilitate, participate or
further the commission of any prostitution offense in violation of
Sections 1028, 1029 or 1030 of this title; provided, however, any
monies, real estate or any other tangible asset or property of a
customer or anyone merely procuring the services of a prostitute
shall not be included;
13. Any vehicle, airplane, vessel, or parts of a vehicle whose
numbers have been removed, altered or obliterated so as to prevent
determination of the true identity or ownership of said property and
parts of vehicles which probable cause indicates are stolen but
whose true ownership cannot be determined;
14. Any and all equipment or instrumentality used in any manner
or part to commit any act of catalytic converter theft in violation
of subsection B of Section 1435 of this title and any monies, coins,
currency, or financial instruments used, derived from or traceable
as proceeds from a violation of subsection B of Section 1435 of this
title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 37

15. Any and all equipment or instrumentality used in any manner
or part to commit any act of copper theft in violation of Section
1727 of this title, and any monies, coins, currency, or financial
instruments used, derived from or traceable as proceeds from a
violation of Section 1727 of this title; and
16. Any and all equipment or instrumentality used in any manner
or part to commit any violation of the Oklahoma Scrap Metal Dealers
Act, and any monies, coins, currency, or financial instruments used
or traceable as proceeds from a violation of the Oklahoma Scrap
Metal Dealers Act.
C. Property described in subsection A or B of this section may
be held as evidence until a forfeiture has been declared or a
release ordered. Forfeiture actions under this section may be
brought by the district attorney in the proper county of venue as
petitioner; provided, in the event the district attorney elects not
to file such action, or fails to file such action within ninety (90)
days of the date of the seizure of such equipment, the property
shall be returned to the owner.
D. Notice of seizure and intended forfeiture proceeding shall
be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court for the
county wherein such property is seized and shall be given all owners
and parties in interest.
E. Notice shall be given according to one of the following
methods:
1. Upon each owner or party in interest whose right, title, or
interest is of record in the Oklahoma Tax Commission or with the
county clerk for filings under the Uniform Commercial Code, served
in the manner of service of process in civil cases prescribed by
Section 2004 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Upon each owner or party in interest whose name and address
is known, served in the manner of service of process in civil cases
prescribed by Section 2004 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or
3. Upon all other owners, whose addresses are unknown, but who
are believed to have an interest in the property by one publication
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 38

in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the
seizure was made.
F. Within sixty (60) days after the mailing or publication of
the notice, the owner of the property and any other party in
interest or claimant may file a verified answer and claim to the
property described in the notice of seizure and of the intended
forfeiture proceeding.
G. If at the end of sixty (60) days after the notice has been
mailed or published there is no verified answer on file, the court
shall hear evidence upon the fact of the unlawful use and may order
the property forfeited to the state, if such fact is proven.
H. If a verified answer is filed, the forfeiture proceeding
shall be set for hearing.
I. At the hearing the petitioner shall prove by clear and
convincing evidence that property was used in the attempt or
commission of an act specified in subsection A of this section or is
property described in subsection B of this section with knowledge by
the owner of the property.
J. The claimant of any right, title, or interest in the
property may prove the lien, mortgage, or conditional sales contract
to be bona fide and that the right, title, or interest created by
the document was created without any knowledge or reason to believe
that the property was being, or was to be, used for the purpose
charged.
K. In the event of such proof, the court may order the property
released to the bona fide or innocent owner, lien holder, mortgagee,
or vendor if the amount due such person is equal to, or in excess
of, the value of the property as of the date of the seizure, it
being the intention of this section to forfeit only the right,
title, or interest of the purchaser, except for items bearing a
counterfeit mark or used exclusively to manufacture a counterfeit
mark.
L. If the amount due to such person is less than the value of
the property, or if no bona fide claim is established, the property
may be forfeited to the state and may be sold pursuant to judgment
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 39

of the court, as on sale upon execution, and as provided in Section
2-508 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, except as otherwise
provided for by law and for property bearing a counterfeit mark
which shall be destroyed.
M. Property taken or detained pursuant to this section shall
not be repleviable, but shall be deemed to be in the custody of the
petitioner or in the custody of the law enforcement agency as
provided in the Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act. Except for
property required to be destroyed pursuant to the Trademark Anti-
Counterfeiting Act, the petitioner shall release said property to
the owner of the property if it is determined that the owner had no
knowledge of the illegal use of the property or if there is
insufficient evidence to sustain the burden of showing illegal use
of such property. If the owner of the property stipulates to the
forfeiture and waives the hearing, the petitioner may determine if
the value of the property is equal to or less than the outstanding
lien. If such lien exceeds the value of the property, the property
may be released to the lien holder. Property which has not been
released by the petitioner shall be subject to the orders and
decrees of the court or the official having jurisdiction thereof.
N. The petitioner, or the law enforcement agency holding
property pursuant to the Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act, shall
not be held civilly liable for having custody of the seized property
or proceeding with a forfeiture action as provided for in this
section.
O. Attorney fees shall not be assessed against the state or the
petitioner for any actions or proceeding pursuant to Section 1701 et
seq. of this title.
P. The proceeds of the sale of any property shall be
distributed as follows, in the order indicated:
1. To the bona fide or innocent purchaser, conditional sales
vendor, or mortgagee of the property, if any, up to the amount of
such person’s interest in the property, when the court declaring the
forfeiture orders a distribution to such person;
2. To the payment of the actual reasonable expenses of
preserving the property;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 40

3. To the victim of the crime to compensate said victim for any
loss incurred as a result of the act for which such property was
forfeited; and
4. The balance to a revolving fund in the office of the county
treasurer of the county wherein the property was seized, to be
distributed as follows: one-third (1/3) to the investigating law
enforcement agency; one-third (1/3) of said fund to be used and
maintained as a revolving fund by the district attorney to be used
to defray any lawful expenses of the office of the district
attorney; and one-third (1/3) to go to the jail maintenance fund,
with a yearly accounting to the board of county commissioners in
whose county the fund is established. If the petitioner is not the
district attorney, then the one-third (1/3) which would have been
designated to that office shall be distributed to the petitioner.
Monies distributed to the jail maintenance fund shall be used to pay
costs for the storage of such property if such property is ordered
released to a bona fide or innocent owner, lien holder, mortgagee,
or vendor and if such funds are available in said fund.
Q. If the court finds that the property was not used in the
attempt or commission of an act specified in subsection A of this
section and was not property subject to forfeiture pursuant to
subsection B of this section and is not property bearing a
counterfeit mark, the court shall order the property released to the
owner as the right, title, or interest appears on record in the Tax
Commission as of the seizure.
R. No vehicle, airplane, or vessel used by a person as a common
carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier shall be
forfeited pursuant to the provisions of this section unless it shall
be proven that the owner or other person in charge of such
conveyance was a consenting party or privy to the attempt or
commission of an act specified in subsection A or B of this section.
No property shall be forfeited pursuant to the provisions of this
section by reason of any act or omission established by the owner
thereof to have been committed or omitted without the knowledge or
consent of such owner, and by any person other than such owner while
such property was unlawfully in the possession of a person other
than the owner in violation of the criminal laws of the United
States or of any state.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 41

S. Whenever any property is forfeited pursuant to this section,
the district court having jurisdiction of the proceeding may order
that the forfeited property may be retained for its official use by
the state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency which seized
the property.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 42

Passed the Senate the 23rd day of February, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1936 Page 43